pt-BR/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pt-BR.dic
abaúlam/L
abjudicar/XYPLcDnv
abraçar/XYPLMDW
abstendo/L
absteríamos/L
abstivera/L
abstivestes/L
acantonar/XYPLM
achatar/XYPLDMW
acodes/L
acotovelar/XYPLM
açular/XYPL
adeque/L
admitir/XYPLBIRé
advenha/L
advido/L
adviéssemos/L
advirás/L
advirtam/L
afiliar/XYPLc
afunilar/XYPLM
agredir/YPL
aguais/PLS
aguo/PLS
ajuízes/SL
aleitar/XYPLcM
alinhavar/XYPLS
alvoraçar/XYPL
amassar/XYPLDMNWvjS
amiudar/YPL
amordaçar/XYPLM
ancorar/XYLPcgRS
anseiam/L
antepassar/XYL
anteverás/L
anteviam/L
antevísseis/L
apadrinhar/XYPLSMD
apanigue/PL
apaziguamos/L
apetecer/XYPLv
aportuguesar/XYPLSMc
aprazendo/L
aprazermos/L
aprender/XYPLRSé
aprouveres/L
aquartelar/XYPLM
arguamos/L
arraigar/XYPLMBS
arrematar/XYPLcDn
arruinai/L
articular/XYPLDcnvBSR
assente/L
assintas/L
atarefar/XYPLMN
atirar/XYPLDW
atritar/XYPL
autenticar/XYPLcD
averbar/XYPLcM
aviar/XYPLDMcRS
azedar/XYPLMD
balcanizar/XYPLc
batalhar/XYLDn
bem-queiramos/L
bem-quereria/L
bem-queríeis/L
bem-quisessem/L
bimbalhar/XYPL
boiamos/L
bombar/XYPLDNWnjk
bravejar/XYPL
bula/RL
cabem/L
caberíeis/L
caçoar/XYPLD
calcar/XYPLD
canibalizar/XYPLnc
caraminholar/XYPL
cascar/XYPL
causticar/XYPLcn
cernir/XYL
chapinhar/XYPL
chupinhar/XYPLcnMD
circularizar/XYPL
ciscar/XYPLD
coabitar/XYLcDn
cobre/SRL
coestrelar/XYPL
coincidir/XYLv
colore/SL
combater/XYPLMví
comensurar/XYPLcv
comercieis/L
compadecer/XYPLMD
compete/L
compitamos/L
comprazeis/L
comprazerias/L
comprometer/XYPLMDS
comprouvéssemos/L
concernem/L
concretar/XYPL
condoemos/PL
condoeres/PL
condoíamos/PL
conferenciar/XYL
congratular/XYPLDcnU
conseguir/YPLMDv
consigo/PL
conspirar/XYLDcn
consumimos/PL
contendes/L
conterem/L
contidos/L
contiver/L
contraditar/XYPLv
contravenhais/L
contravieres/L
contravindo/L
contraviria/L
convenhais/L
conviera/L
conviestes/L
convireis/L
convulsionar/XYPL
correlatar/XYPL
corroeram/PL
corroerias/PL
corroída/PL
cospes/L
coubermos/L
creem/SL
criptografar/XYPLS
cubro/SRL
cuspam/L
dais/PL
dares/PL
debater/XYPLDv
declinar/XYPLcDnv
defecar/XYLDcé
deflitamos/L
dei/PL
democratizar/XYPLDcnRO
demulamos/L
denigres/L
depreender/XYPL
derreter/XYPLDMNW
desagueis/L
desambiguem/PL
descabendo/L
descabes/L
descamar/XYPLc
descobris/RPL
descoubessem/L
desejar/XYPLDBn
desgrenhar/XYPLB
desistir/XYL
desmesurar/XYPLvB
desmiúde/L
despeçam/L
despencar/XYPL
despropositar/XYLB
destes/PL
desvirginar/XYPLMé
deterão/PL
deter/PLB
detiveram/PL
detonar/XYPLDcv
dificultar/XYPLDc
dirimir/XYPLnv
discorrer/XYL
dispo/L
dissinta/PL
diverge/L
divirjais/L
doais/L
doerão/L
doermos/L
doído/L
dormimos/L
dulcificar/XYPL
eclodir/YL
efeminizar/XYPL
elucidar/XYPLDc
embarangar/XYPLM
embestar/XYPLBS
embravecer/XYPLM
emitir/XYPLnRé
empastar/XYPLM
empedirnam/SL
empoçar/XYPLM
emputecer/XYPLD!
encaldeirar/XYPL
encarecer/XYPLMDB
enceleirar/XYPLM
encobris/SL
encrespar/XYPLMD
endireitar/XYPLMR
enfeitiçar/XYPLD
enfunilar/XYPLM
englobar/XYPLMBn
engrolar/XYPL
enlevar/XYPL
enraízam/SL
enrobustecer/XYPL
ensanguentar/XYPL
entijolar/XYPL
entrelaçar/XYPLMS
entreténs/L
entreter/PLM
entretiveras/L
entrever/XYPL
entupimos/SL
envergonhar/XYPLMBNW
enviúvem/L
enxaguo/PL
equivaleis/L
éreis/PL
esboroar/XYPL
escapulir/XYL
escorraçar/XYPL
esfacelar/XYPLM
esganar/XYPLcD
esmiuçai/L
esmiuçareis/L
esmiuçássemos/L
esmiuçou/L
espatifar/XYPL
espelhar/XYPLMBcnv
espocar/XYPL
esquentar/XYPLDMNWc
estai/L
estarem/L
estavas/L
estimular/XYPLDcnvRSí
estivésseis/L
estralar/XYPL
estudar/XYPLBWnR
evacuar/XYPLcné
exclamar/XYPLcD
exorbitar/XYPLn
expedir/YLRcMD
expilamos/L
expludam/L
externalizar/XYPLc
facilitar/XYPLcD
farejar/XYPLDv
felicitar/XYPLDcI
filtrar/XYPLDMcnvgEI
flatular/XYPLcn
flitas/L
fogem/L
forjar/XYPLDMR
fosses/LP
frenar/XYPLng
fujam/L
futilizar/XYPL
ganir/XYL
gaucheis/L
germinar/XYPLDcnE
gourmetizar/XYPLDc
gravidar/XYPL
gulosar/XYL
haveis/PL
haveríeis/PL
hemos/PL
homogeneizai/L
hormonizar/XYPLcé
houver/PL
idas/L
ilustrar/XYPLDNWc
impeço/PL
imperar/XYPLn
imprensar/XYPLD
incendeiam/L
incinerar/XYPLcD
indicar/XYPLDcEé
inferiorizar/XYPL
inocentar/XYPL
instilar/XYPL
instruídos/PL
instruiremos/PL
instruíste/PL
intercalar/XYPLBc
intermedeio/L
intervalar/XYPLB
interviera/L
interviestes/L
intervireis/L
intrincar/XYPLS
investir/YPLMvRS
irei/L
irromper/XYPLv
jazem/L
jurar/XYPLDMNW
lambujar/XYPL
latinizar/XYPLcn
leiloar/XYPLM
libertar/XYPLDcé
licencie/L
listar/XYPLgS
luxuriar/XYLn
malhar/XYPLDNWcjk
malquererdes/L
malqueríamos/L
malquiserem/L
manchar/XYPLDMWRS
mantende/PL
manteremos/PL
mantinham/PL
mantivésseis/PL
marginalizar/XYPLnc
matracar/XYPL
medeies/L
medir/YPLRcDv
mensurar/XYPLcDv
metabolizar/XYPLcvD
militarizar/XYPLcRS
minguemos/L
mirar/XYPLn
mochilar/XYPL
moerás/PL
moêssemos/PL
moí/PL
morder/XYPLDNWn
mujais/L
multicoluram/L
mutuar/XYPLcDn
negligenciar/XYPLv
novar/XYPL
obrigar/XYPLDcnS
obstrue/SL
obstruirá/SL
obstruir/PLnS
obtende/PL
obteremos/PL
obtinham/PL
obtivésseis/PL
odeiem/L
ofuscar/XYPLDMcnvA
opinar/XYPLDnví
ornamentar/XYPLcD
ousar/XYPLBN
pagar/XYPLDMcnvERí
parai/PL
pare/PL
passivar/XYPLc
pechar/XYPL
penalizar/XYPLcnDS
percas/L
peregrinar/XYPLcDn
permanecer/XYLn
persigamos/PL
petiscar/XYPLD
piorar/XYPLWS
platinar/XYPLDé
poderei/L
podias/L
polis/L
pontualizar/XYPL
porias/PL
posso/L
precarizar/XYPLcD
prefigurar/XYPLc
premiai/L
preponderar/XYLn
pressintais/PL
preveis/PL
preverdes/PL
previa/PL
previra/PL
previstes/PL
privatizar/XYPLDcnRSé
progredimos/L
proíbas/PL
pronar/XYPLcD
prossegue/PL
protestar/XYPLcD
provêm/L
proviemos/L
provieste/L
provirei/L
publicizar/XYPLc
pudéssemos/L
pulo/plL
pusera/PL
putrificar/XYPL
quelar/XYPLcn
quereres/L
queridos/L
quiséreis/L
rachar/XYPLDNW
ranhurar/XYPL
reaver/XYPL
rebula/L
reciprocar/XYPL
redigir/XYPL
reflete/L
reformar/XYPLDNWcvéí
regozijar/XYPLD
regulamentar/XYPLDcASUé
relinchar/XYPLn
remedieis/L
remoçar/XYPLM
remoêreis/PL
remoeste/PL
remover/XYPLDMvé
repelir/YPLn
repilas/L
repudiar/XYPLcnv
requeres/L
respeitar/XYPLDBNnS
ressintais/PL
retalhar/XYPLMD
reterá/PL
reteve/PL
retivera/PL
retornar/XYPLMvé
reunimos/L
reverão/PL
rever/PLD
revigorar/XYPLDMn
revisse/PL
revolucionar/XYPLM
rio/pWL
rodopiar/XYPLn
roêreis/PL
roeste/PL
roletar/XYPL
rufar/XYPL
ruralizar/XYPL
saberemos/L
sabido/L
sacuda/L
salgar/XYPLnS
sarrar/XYPL
saúdo/RL
seguem/PLS
semelhar/XYPLnS
sê/PL
seriam/PL
servis/PL
sidas/PL
simular/XYPLcD
siriricar/XYPL!
soais/PL
sobre-excitar/XYPLc
socorrer/XYPLMD
soereis/PL
soesses/PL
sói/PL
somar/XYPL
sorriamos/L
soube/L
soubesses/L
subir/YPLMé
substantivar/XYPLc
sulfatizar/XYPLc
superar/XYPLDNWcnvU
suprimir/XYPLv
surtes/L
sustenhamos/L
susteríamos/L
sustivera/L
sustivestes/L
tarifar/XYPLc
televisionar/XYPLM
tenhas/PL
terem/PL
teve/PL
tirar/XYPLDcngé
tivésseis/PL
tonitruar/XYPLn
tossir/YLD
trago/plPL
transformar/XYPLDNWcnvUé
transitar/XYLví
traquinar/XYL
traulitar/XYPL
trazia/PL
triangular/pdXYPLDc
tropicalizar/XYPLc
trouxessem/PL
turbinar/XYPL
umectar/XYPLcnA
utilizar/XYPLDcvIRu
valer/YLM
variar/XYPLcnvIS
veja/PL
venho/L
veres/PL
vês/PL
vibrar/XYPLcDn
viesse/L
vindas/L
víramos/PL
viríamos/L
vistais/LPS
viuvai/L
vocabulizar/XYPL
vulnerar/XYPLc
